el: Υλικό του κροτάλου: Γυάλινες χάντρες; Μεταλλικές χάντρες; Μεταλλικά κουδουνάκια; Ανάμεικτα υλικά; Φυσικά δόντια (από οστό); Πλαστικές χάντρες; Ξύλινες χάντρες; Άλλο
th: วัสดุขององค์ประกอบเขย่า: ลูกปัดแก้ว; ลูกปัดโลหะ; กระพรวนโลหะ; วัสดุผสม; ฟันธรรมชาติ (กระดูก); ลูกปัดพลาสติก; ลูกปัดไม้; อื่นๆ
fi: Helistinelementin materiaali: Lasihelmet; Metallihelmet; Metallikulkuset; Sekamateriaalit; Luonnolliset hampaat (luu); Muovihelmet; Puuhelmet; Muu
sv: Material för skallraelement: Glaspärlor; Metallpärlor; Metallbjällror; Blandade material; Naturliga tänder (ben); Plastpärlor; Träpärlor; Övrigt
nb: Materiale for rangleelement: Glassperler; Metallperler; Metallbjeller; Blandede materialer; Naturlige tenner (bein); Plastperler; Treperler; Annet
sl-SI: Material ropotajočih elementov: Steklene kroglice; Kovinske kroglice; Kovinski kraguljčki; Mešani materiali; Naravni zobje (kost); Plastične kroglice; Lesene kroglice; Drugo
ro-RO: Materialul elementului zornăitor: Mărgele de sticlă; Mărgele de metal; Clopoței de metal; Materiale mixte; Dinți naturali (os); Mărgele de plastic; Mărgele de lemn; Altele
lt-LT: Barškančio elemento medžiaga: Stikliniai karoliukai; Metaliniai karoliukai; Metaliniai žvangučiai; Mišrios medžiagos; Natūralūs dantys (kaulas); Plastikiniai karoliukai; Mediniai karoliukai; Kita
tr: Çıngırak elemanı malzemesi: Cam boncuklar; Metal boncuklar; Metal ziller; Karışık malzemeler; Doğal diş (kemik); Plastik boncuklar; Ahşap boncuklar; Diğer
sk-SK: Materiál hrkajúceho prvku: Sklenené guľôčky; Kovové guľôčky; Kovové rolničky; Zmiešané materiály; Prírodné zuby (kosť); Plastové guľôčky; Drevené guľôčky; Iné
ru: Материал элементов трещотки: Стеклянные бусины; Металлические бусины; Металлические бубенчики; Смешанные материалы; Натуральные зубы (кость); Пластиковые бусины; Деревянные бусины; Другое
es: Material del elemento de sonajero: Cuentas de vidrio; Cuentas de metal; Sonajas de metal; Materiales mixtos; Dientes naturales (hueso); Cuentas de plástico; Cuentas de madera; Otro
de: Material der Rasselelemente: Glasperlen; Metallperlen; Metallschellen; Materialmix; Natürliche Zähne (Knochen); Kunststoffperlen; Holzperlen; Sonstige
zh-CN: 响片元件材料: 玻璃珠; 金属珠; 金属铃铛; 混合材料; 天然牙齿（骨）; 塑料珠; 木珠; 其他
hr-HR: Materijal elementa zvečke: Staklene perle; Metalne perle; Metalni zvončići; Mješoviti materijali; Prirodni zubi (kost); Plastične perle; Drvene perle; Ostalo
da: Materiale i rasleelementer: Glasperler; Metalperler; Metalbjælder; Blandede materialer; Naturlige tænder (knogle); Plastperler; Træperler; Andet
zh-TW: 響鈴元件材質: 玻璃珠; 金屬珠; 金屬鈴鐺; 混合材質; 天然牙齒 (骨頭); 塑膠珠; 木珠; 其他
pt-PT: Material do elemento sonoro: Contas de vidro; Contas de metal; Soalhas de metal; Materiais mistos; Dentes naturais (osso); Contas de plástico; Contas de madeira; Outro
pt-BR: Rattle elemento material: Contas de vidro; Contas de metal; Platinelas de metal; Materiais mistos; Dentes naturais (osso); Contas de plástico; Contas de madeira; Outros
fr: Matériau des éléments sonores: Perles de verre; Perles de métal; Cymbalettes en métal; Matériaux mixtes; Dents naturelles (os); Perles en plastique; Perles en bois; Autre
ko: 딸랑이 요소 소재: 유리 구슬; 금속 구슬; 금속 징글; 혼합 소재; 자연 치아(뼈); 플라스틱 구슬; 나무 구슬; 기타
vi: Vật liệu tạo tiếng kêu lạch cạch: Hạt thủy tinh; Hạt kim loại; Vòng kim loại; Vật liệu hỗn hợp; Răng/xương tự nhiên; Hạt nhựa; Hạt gỗ; Khác
bg-BG: Материал на дрънкалката: Стъклени мъниста; Метални мъниста; Метални звънчета; Смесени материали; Естествени зъби (кост); Пластмасови мъниста; Дървени мъниста; Други
en: Rattle element material: Glass beads; Metal beads; Metal jingles; Mixed materials; Natural teeth (bone); Plastic beads; Wood beads; Other
nl: Ratel element materiaal: Glazen kralen; Metalen kralen; Metalen belletjes; Gemengde materialen; Natuurlijke tanden (bot); Plastic kralen; Houten kralen; Overig
pl: Materiał elementu grzechotki: Szklane koraliki; Metalowe koraliki; Metalowe blaszki; Materiały mieszane; Naturalne zęby (kość); Plastikowe koraliki; Drewniane koraliki; Inne
ja: ラトル要素の素材: ガラスビーズ; 金属ビーズ; 金属ジングル; 混合素材; 天然の歯 (骨); プラスチックビーズ; 木製ビーズ; その他
hu: Csörgőelem anyaga: Üveggyöngyök; Fémgyöngyök; Fém csörgők; Vegyes anyagok; Természetes fogak (csont); Műanyag gyöngyök; Fagyöngyök; Egyéb
cs: Materiál chrastítka: Skleněné korálky; Kovové korálky; Kovové rolničky; Kombinované materiály; Přírodní zuby (kost); Plastové korálky; Dřevěné korálky; Ostatní
it: Materiale dell'elemento sonaglio: Perline di vetro; Perline di metallo; Sonagli di metallo; Materiali misti; Denti naturali (osso); Perline di plastica; Perline di legno; Altro